Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

30-35-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado County Home Rule Powers Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1461, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that, in order to better meet and resolve problems of growth and urbanization and to promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the people, county government should be strengthened and provided more flexibility in its powers; therefore, this article is enacted with the intent to implement the provisions of section 16 of article XIV of the state constitution to provide home rule powers for the counties of this state and shall be liberally construed to effect such intent.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1461, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-103. Home rule counties - general powers.

Any county which adopts, has adopted, or proposes to adopt a county home rule charter to establish the organization and structure of county government, pursuant to the provisions of part 5 of article 11 of this title, may provide in such charter, or amendment thereto for the adoption of all or certain of the home rule powers authorized pursuant to the provisions of this article. In addition to powers authorized in this article, a home rule county, and its officers and employees, shall have all the powers of any county not adopting a home rule charter, except as otherwise provided in this article or in the charter or in the state constitution.

None of the home rule powers granted in this article shall be exercised by a home rule county within the corporate limits of any municipality or territory annexed thereto, nor shall any fee, tax, assessment, or levy of any kind be imposed within such municipality for the exercise of any of the county home rule powers which are not authorized for nonhome rule counties, unless consent thereto is first given by the governing body of such municipality. Nothing contained in this article shall affect the power, otherwise granted by law, of a home rule county to own, operate, and maintain real and personal property within the corporate limits of any municipality.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this part 1, none of the powers authorized in this article shall be applied to any municipal property, functions, services, or facilities, whether provided or located within or outside municipal boundaries, as the boundaries may from time to time exist, unless consent thereto is first given by the governing body of the municipality. This part 1 shall not be construed as limiting the authority of any municipality nor as expanding the authority of any county with respect to any municipality or any municipal property, functions, services, or facilities.

A home rule county shall provide all mandatory county functions, services, and facilities and shall exercise all mandatory powers as are required by law for counties not having home rule powers. A home rule county may provide all permissive functions, services, and facilities and may exercise all permissive powers granted in this article and by other law applicable to counties not having home rule powers, except as otherwise provided in this article or in the charter or in the state constitution.

A home rule county shall be a body politic and corporate, under such name and style as prescribed by law, and may sue and be sued, contract or be contracted with, acquire and hold real and personal property, have a common seal which it may change and alter at pleasure, and have such other privileges as are incident to corporations of like character or degree, not inconsistent with its charter or the laws of this state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1461, § 1, effective June 8.